Contents/Resources/Wolfram Player.app/Contents/SystemFiles/Components/SpellingData/SpellingDictionaries/fr_Supplemental.aff
FLAG num
SFX 995 N 1
SFX 995 0 hinda .

SFX 996 N 1
SFX 996 0 hinshahr .

SFX 997 N 1
SFX 997 0 hire .

SFX 998 N 1
SFX 998 0 hiwal .

SFX 999 N 1
SFX 999 0 hjahanpur .

SFX 1000 N 1
SFX 1000 0 hnpei .

SFX 1001 N 1
SFX 1001 0 ho .

SFX 1002 N 1
SFX 1002 0 hr .

SFX 1003 N 1
SFX 1003 0 hradun .

SFX 1004 N 1
SFX 1004 0 hre .

SFX 1005 N 1
SFX 1005 0 hreza .

SFX 1006 N 1
SFX 1006 0 hri .

SFX 1007 N 1
SFX 1007 0 hriar .

SFX 1008 N 1
SFX 1008 0 hroud .

SFX 1009 N 1
SFX 1009 0 ht .

SFX 1010 N 1
SFX 1010 0 hu .

SFX 1011 N 1
SFX 1011 0 hua .

SFX 1012 N 1
SFX 1012 0 huahua .

SFX 1013 N 1
SFX 1013 0 huano .

SFX 1014 N 1
SFX 1014 0 hui .

SFX 1015 N 1
SFX 1015 0 hur .

SFX 1016 N 1
SFX 1016 0 i .

SFX 1017 N 1
SFX 1017 0 î .

SFX 1018 N 1
SFX 1018 0 ï .

SFX 1019 N 1
SFX 1019 0 ia .

SFX 1020 N 1
SFX 1020 0 ïa .

SFX 1021 N 1
SFX 1021 0 iago .

SFX 1022 N 1
SFX 1022 0 iam .

SFX 1023 N 1
SFX 1023 0 iams .

SFX 1024 N 1
SFX 1024 0 iamsburg .

SFX 1025 N 1
SFX 1025 0 iamson .

SFX 1026 N 1
SFX 1026 0 ian .

SFX 1027 N 1
SFX 1027 0 iane .

SFX 1028 N 1
SFX 1028 0 iaro .

SFX 1029 N 1
SFX 1029 0 ías .

SFX 1030 N 1
SFX 1030 0 iatá .

SFX 1031 N 1
SFX 1031 0 ica .

SFX 1032 N 1
SFX 1032 0 icester .

SFX 1033 N 1
SFX 1033 0 ich .

SFX 1034 N 1
SFX 1034 0 icias .

SFX 1035 N 1
SFX 1035 0 ïd .

SFX 1036 N 1
SFX 1036 0 ïda .

SFX 1037 N 1
SFX 1037 0 ie .

SFX 1038 N 1
SFX 1038 0 ién .

SFX 1039 N 1
SFX 1039 0 ieta .

SFX 1040 N 1
SFX 1040 0 ïevo .

SFX 1041 N 1
SFX 1041 0 ig .

SFX 1042 N 1
SFX 1042 0 íge .

SFX 1043 N 1
SFX 1043 0 ijeongbu .

SFX 1044 N 1
SFX 1044 0 ikaga .

SFX 1045 N 1
SFX 1045 0 il .

SFX 1046 N 1
SFX 1046 0 ilal .

SFX 1047 N 1
SFX 1047 0 ildon .

SFX 1048 N 1
SFX 1048 0 ilevo .

SFX 1049 N 1
SFX 1049 0 ilicate .

SFX 1050 N 1
SFX 1050 0 ill .

SFX 1051 N 1
SFX 1051 0 illo .

SFX 1052 N 1
SFX 1052 0 illwater .

SFX 1053 N 1
SFX 1053 0 iltree .

SFX 1054 N 1
SFX 1054 0 in .

SFX 1055 N 1
SFX 1055 0 ina .

SFX 1056 N 1
SFX 1056 0 ína .

SFX 1057 N 1
SFX 1057 0 iname .

SFX 1058 N 1
SFX 1058 0 șinău .

SFX 1059 N 1
SFX 1059 0 ine .

SFX 1060 N 1
SFX 1060 0 ing .

SFX 1061 N 1
SFX 1061 0 ingdon .

SFX 1062 N 1
SFX 1062 0 ingen .

SFX 1063 N 1
SFX 1063 0 ingham .

SFX 1064 N 1
SFX 1064 0 ington .

SFX 1065 N 1
SFX 1065 0 ingui .

SFX 1066 N 1
SFX 1066 0 inn .

SFX 1067 N 1
SFX 1067 0 ino .

SFX 1068 N 1
SFX 1068 0 ins .

SFX 1069 N 1
SFX 1069 0 insett .

SFX 1070 N 1
SFX 1070 0 int .

SFX 1071 N 1
SFX 1071 0 inta .

SFX 1072 N 1
SFX 1072 0 intah .

SFX 1073 N 1
SFX 1073 0 inte .

SFX 1074 N 1
SFX 1074 0 iot .

SFX 1075 N 1
SFX 1075 0 ipan .

SFX 1076 N 1
SFX 1076 0 ipat .

SFX 1077 N 1
SFX 1077 0 ipeg .

SFX 1078 N 1
SFX 1078 0 ipzig .

SFX 1079 N 1
SFX 1079 0 ir .

SFX 1080 N 1
SFX 1080 0 ira .

SFX 1081 N 1
SFX 1081 0 irbanks .

SFX 1082 N 1
SFX 1082 0 irfax .

SFX 1083 N 1
SFX 1083 0 irfield .

SFX 1084 N 1
SFX 1084 0 irhat .

SFX 1085 N 1
SFX 1085 0 iria .

SFX 1086 N 1
SFX 1086 0 irie .

SFX 1087 N 1
SFX 1087 0 irling .

SFX 1088 N 1
SFX 1088 0 is .

SFX 1089 N 1
SFX 1089 0 isalabad .

SFX 1090 N 1
SFX 1090 0 isch .

SFX 1091 N 1
SFX 1091 0 ista .

SFX 1092 N 1
SFX 1092 0 isterre .

SFX 1093 N 1
SFX 1093 0 itama .

SFX 1094 N 1
SFX 1094 0 ite .

SFX 1095 N 1
SFX 1095 0 itenhage .

SFX 1096 N 1
SFX 1096 0 ito .

SFX 1097 N 1
SFX 1097 0 itou .

SFX 1098 N 1
SFX 1098 0 itrim .

SFX 1099 N 1
SFX 1099 0 itung .

SFX 1100 N 1
SFX 1100 0 iwetok .

SFX 1101 N 1
SFX 1101 0 iwon .

SFX 1102 N 1
SFX 1102 0 iya .

SFX 1103 N 1
SFX 1103 0 iyadpur .

SFX 1104 N 1
SFX 1104 0 iyang .

SFX 1105 N 1
SFX 1105 0 izabad .

SFX 1106 N 1
SFX 1106 0 izabeth .

SFX 1107 N 1
SFX 1107 0 ize .

SFX 1108 N 1
SFX 1108 0 izhou .

SFX 1109 N 1
SFX 1109 0 izia .

SFX 1110 N 1
SFX 1110 0 izu .

SFX 1111 N 1
SFX 1111 0 j .

SFX 1112 N 1
SFX 1112 0 ja .

SFX 1113 N 1
SFX 1113 0 jab .

SFX 1114 N 1
SFX 1114 0 jae .

SFX 1115 N 1
SFX 1115 0 jaïrah .

SFX 1116 N 1
SFX 1116 0 jardo .

SFX 1117 N 1
SFX 1117 0 jdour .

SFX 1118 N 1
SFX 1118 0 jeeling .

SFX 1119 N 1
SFX 1119 0 jel .

SFX 1120 N 1
SFX 1120 0 ji .

SFX 1121 N 1
SFX 1121 0 jian .

SFX 1122 N 1
SFX 1122 0 jiang .

SFX 1123 N 1
SFX 1123 0 jiazhuang .

SFX 1124 N 1
SFX 1124 0 jieda .

SFX 1125 N 1
SFX 1125 0 jimi .

SFX 1126 N 1
SFX 1126 0 jin .

SFX 1127 N 1
SFX 1127 0 jing .

SFX 1128 N 1
SFX 1128 0 jinomiya .

SFX 1129 N 1
SFX 1129 0 jisawa .

SFX 1130 N 1
SFX 1130 0 jjain .

SFX 1131 N 1
SFX 1131 0 k .

SFX 1132 N 1
SFX 1132 0 kai .

SFX 1133 N 1
SFX 1133 0 kaka .

SFX 1134 N 1
SFX 1134 0 kakulam .

SFX 1135 N 1
SFX 1135 0 Kalb .

SFX 1136 N 1
SFX 1136 0 kalpakistan .

SFX 1137 N 1
SFX 1137 0 kan .

SFX 1138 N 1
SFX 1138 0 kang .

SFX 1139 N 1
SFX 1139 0 kaofo .

SFX 1140 N 1
SFX 1140 0 karpur .

SFX 1141 N 1
SFX 1141 0 karya .

SFX 1142 N 1
SFX 1142 0 kata .

SFX 1143 N 1
SFX 1143 0 kawanna .

SFX 1144 N 1
SFX 1144 0 kaya .

SFX 1145 N 1
SFX 1145 0 ke .

SFX 1146 N 1
SFX 1146 0 kelon .

SFX 1147 N 1
SFX 1147 0 ken .

SFX 1148 N 1
SFX 1148 0 kesha .

SFX 1149 N 1
SFX 1149 0 keshi .

SFX 1150 N 1
SFX 1150 0 ket .

SFX 1151 N 1
SFX 1151 0 kha .

SFX 1152 N 1
SFX 1152 0 khaline .

SFX 1153 N 1
SFX 1153 0 khalinsk .

SFX 1154 N 1
SFX 1154 0 khara .

SFX 1155 N 1
SFX 1155 0 khart .

SFX 1156 N 1
SFX 1156 0 khbuz .

SFX 1157 N 1
SFX 1157 0 khon .

SFX 1158 N 1
SFX 1158 0 ki .

SFX 1159 N 1
SFX 1159 0 kia .

SFX 1160 N 1
SFX 1160 0 kiakum .

SFX 1161 N 1
SFX 1161 0 kişehir .

SFX 1162 N 1
SFX 1162 0 kima .

SFX 1163 N 1
SFX 1163 0 kmagalur .

SFX 1164 N 1
SFX 1164 0 knap .

SFX 1165 N 1
SFX 1165 0 ko .

SFX 1166 N 1
SFX 1166 0 kon .

SFX 1167 N 1
SFX 1167 0 konam .

SFX 1168 N 1
SFX 1168 0 kou .

SFX 1169 N 1
SFX 1169 0 kouïbychevsk .

SFX 1170 N 1
SFX 1170 0 kouznetsk .

SFX 1171 N 1
SFX 1171 0 kovo .

SFX 1172 N 1
SFX 1172 0 kraine .

SFX 1173 N 1
SFX 1173 0 ks .

SFX 1174 N 1
SFX 1174 0 kuba .

SFX 1175 N 1
SFX 1175 0 kui .

SFX 1176 N 1
SFX 1176 0 kuoka .

SFX 1177 N 1
SFX 1177 0 kur .

SFX 1178 N 1
SFX 1178 0 kura .

SFX 1179 N 1
SFX 1179 0 kushima .

SFX 1180 N 1
SFX 1180 0 kutat .

SFX 1181 N 1
SFX 1181 0 kuyama .

SFX 1182 N 1
SFX 1182 0 kwawa .

SFX 1183 N 1
SFX 1183 0 l .

SFX 1184 N 1
SFX 1184 0 la .

SFX 1185 N 1
SFX 1185 0 laam .

SFX 1186 N 1
SFX 1186 0 laan .

SFX 1187 N 1
SFX 1187 0 lacgrīva .

SFX 1188 N 1
SFX 1188 0 lah .

SFX 1189 N 1
SFX 1189 0 lamshahr .

SFX 1190 N 1
SFX 1190 0 lan .

SFX 1191 N 1
SFX 1191 0 lana .

SFX 1192 N 1
SFX 1192 0 land .

SFX 1193 N 1
SFX 1193 0 lands .

SFX 1194 N 1
SFX 1194 0 lary .

SFX 1195 N 1
SFX 1195 0 lawa .

SFX 1196 N 1
SFX 1196 0 lawny .

SFX 1197 N 1
SFX 1197 0 lba .

SFX 1198 N 1
SFX 1198 0 lberg .

SFX 1199 N 1
SFX 1199 0 lcón .

SFX 1200 N 1
SFX 1200 0 lda .

SFX 1201 N 1
SFX 1201 0 lder .

SFX 1202 N 1
SFX 1202 0 ldoorn .

SFX 1203 N 1
SFX 1203 0 ldress .

SFX 1204 N 1
SFX 1204 0 le .

SFX 1205 N 1
SFX 1205 0 lede .

SFX 1206 N 1
SFX 1206 0 lee .

SFX 1207 N 1
SFX 1207 0 leja .

SFX 1208 N 1
SFX 1208 0 lemane .

SFX 1209 N 1
SFX 1209 0 lești .

SFX 1210 N 1
SFX 1210 0 leton .

SFX 1211 N 1
SFX 1211 0 levue .

SFX 1212 N 1
SFX 1212 0 ley .

SFX 1213 N 1
SFX 1213 0 lgou .

SFX 1214 N 1
SFX 1214 0 lhasnagar .

SFX 1215 N 1
SFX 1215 0 li .

SFX 1216 N 1
SFX 1216 0 liao .

SFX 1217 N 1
SFX 1217 0 lie .

SFX 1218 N 1
SFX 1218 0 lin .

SFX 1219 N 1
SFX 1219 0 ling .

SFX 1220 N 1
SFX 1220 0 lington .

SFX 1221 N 1
SFX 1221 0 linhot .

SFX 1222 N 1
SFX 1222 0 liott .

SFX 1223 N 1
SFX 1223 0 lis .

SFX 1224 N 1
SFX 1224 0 livan .

SFX 1225 N 1
SFX 1225 0 lk .

SFX 1226 N 1
SFX 1226 0 lkiemdé .

SFX 1227 N 1
SFX 1227 0 ll .

SFX 1228 N 1
SFX 1228 0 llas .

SFX 1229 N 1
SFX 1229 0 llerton .

SFX 1230 N 1
SFX 1230 0 llon .

SFX 1231 N 1
SFX 1231 0 llong .

SFX 1232 N 1
SFX 1232 0 lloujah .

SFX 1233 N 1
SFX 1233 0 lls .

SFX 1234 N 1
SFX 1234 0 lm .

SFX 1235 N 1
SFX 1235 0 lo .

SFX 1236 N 1
SFX 1236 0 lobusha .

SFX 1237 N 1
SFX 1237 0 loche .

SFX 1238 N 1
SFX 1238 0 lodiya .

SFX 1239 N 1
SFX 1239 0 logne .

SFX 1240 N 1
SFX 1240 0 lona .

SFX 1241 N 1
SFX 1241 0 long .
