Contents/Resources/Wolfram Player.app/Contents/SystemFiles/Components/SpellingData/SpellingDictionaries/fr_Supplemental.dic
Ada/1079,1252,1253,1263,1274,1308,1314,1499
Ahmad/1016,1318
Alo/1112,1530
Ape/1202
Aragua/1056
Bari/1237,1253,1324,1489,1603
Béja/1020
Berks/997
Bernard/1067,1433
Bow/1037,1259
Cauca/1019
Church/1050
Colonia/1183
Concord/1019
Crow/1212
Daman/1015
Dill/1062,1063,1450
Dix/1037,1450
Gee/1241
Gera/1088,1724
Ghat/1238
Haa/1166,1573,1574
Havel/1016
Heide/1198,1382
High/1192,1193
Ida/1001
Itam/1016
Jordan/1037
Kasuga/1016
Khas/1171,1607
Kumba/1167
Lac/1143,1205
Lake/1192,1792
Laval/1207
Mary/1192
Mato/1184
Meta/1086
Miguel/1096
Mogi/1184
Niger/1019
Och/1053
Ola/1059,1334,1704
Orel/1191
Pine/1228,1599
Pins/1131
Qian/1122
Ras/1009,1055
Roo/1173,1571,1627
Sanda/1137,1741
Sri/1134,1318
Talca/1013
Tama/1204,1314,1408,1688,1739
Tasman/1037
Tunis/1037
Wau/1148,1488,1631
